Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-635
Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Program Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Program Cash Fund is created and shall consist of money appropriated by the Legislature, gifts, grants, costs, fees, or charges from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. The money shall be used to carry out the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB909, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.